Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 3 Curative Services

40.1-3-1.
Duties assumed by department.

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall assume all powers and duties specified in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 52; G.L. 1938, ch. 51, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

40-3-1

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40.1-3-2.
Offices.

The department of administration shall furnish the department with proper and adequate office space and equipment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1906, ch. 1362, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 112, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 155, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 51, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

40-3-2

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40.1-3-3.
Sanatorium known as Zambarano Memorial Unit.

In tribute to the memory of the late Dr. U. E. Zambarano, former superintendent of the state sanatorium, counselor, administrator, and humanitarian, whose “friendly deportment fostered a spirit of cooperation and unity,” the state sanatorium at Wallum Lake, Rhode Island, shall hereafter be known as the “Doctor U. E. Zambarano unit of the Eleanor Slater Hospital.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3453, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

40-3-3

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1998, ch. 391, § 5; P.L. 2002, ch. 333, § 1.

40.1-3-4.
Care of Zambarano hospital property.

The hospital land, being a tract of land owned by the state, located in the town of Burrillville, at and adjacent to Wallum Pond, with all the buildings thereon and all the furniture, furnishings, fittings, fixtures, apparatus, farming utensils, and equipment and property of all descriptions belonging to the state now or hereafter contained in those buildings or on that land, shall be in the care and custody of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1247, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 112, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 155, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 51, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1955, ch. 3453, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-3-4; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1984, ch. 81, § 17.

40.1-3-5.
Physicians and employees of Zambarano hospital.

The director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals may appoint all physicians he or she may deem necessary for the hospital, and all other assistants and employees necessary for the performance of the duties of the department, and for the proper administration of the affairs of the hospital, all of whom shall serve as prescribed by chapter 4 of title 36. The director may fix the compensation of all persons so appointed or employed, within the amounts appropriated therefor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1247, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 112, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 155, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 51, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 17; impl. am. P.L. 1955, ch. 3453, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-3-5; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40.1-3-6.
Support of Zambarano hospital patients.

The charge for the support of the patients of the hospital as are of sufficient ability to pay for same, or have persons or kindred bound by law to maintain them, shall be paid by those patients, persons, or kindred, at a rate to be determined by the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals. The board of the patients as have a legal settlement in some city or town shall be paid by the city or town, if those patients are received at the hospital on the request of the director of public welfare of the city or town. The director, in his or her discretion, may receive other patients who have no means to pay for treatment, and the expense for board of those patients shall be paid by the general treasurer. But no board shall be paid by the general treasurer for anyone having a legal settlement in another state. The director shall have the power to fix all charges for board of the patients, and the amount that he or she may so receive shall be paid over to the general treasurer monthly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1247, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 112, § 4; G.L. 1932, ch. 155, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 51, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1955, ch. 3453, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-3-6; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1984, ch. 81, § 17.

40.1-3-7.
Rules and regulations for Eleanor Slater hospital.

The director of the department shall establish, in the director’s discretion, rules for the government of the Eleanor Slater hospital, regulations for the admission of patients, and shall generally be vested with all the powers necessary for the proper carrying on of the work entrusted to him or her.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1247, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 112, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 155, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 51, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1955, ch. 3453, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-3-7; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 2002, ch. 333, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 4, effective June 27, 2022.

40.1-3-7.1.
Rules and regulations for the Rhode Island state psychiatric hospital.

The director of the department shall establish, in the director’s discretion, rules for the governance of the Rhode Island state psychiatric hospital, regulations for the admission of patients, and shall generally be vested with all the powers necessary for the proper carrying on of the work entrusted to him or her.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 5, effective June 27, 2022.

40.1-3-7.2.
Residency within state not required for employees of Zambarano Hospital.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any public or general law or personnel rule or regulation to the contrary, there shall no longer be any requirement or provision that an employee of Zambarano Hospital reside within the state as a condition of continued employment. Any prior validation by the general assembly of any public or general law or personnel rule or regulation to the contrary requiring residency as a condition of employment by an employee of Zambarano Hospital is expressly repealed by the general assembly. Any existing law or personnel rule or regulation requiring such is considered void and violative of state law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 345, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 441, § 1.

40.1-3-8.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 3, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 3, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 53, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 40-3-8; P.L. 1962, ch. 5, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1993, ch. 82, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 333, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 6, effective June 27, 2022.

40.1-3-8.1 — 40.1-3-8.3.
[Repealed.]

40.1-3-9.
Staff and employees of the Eleanor Slater hospital and of the Rhode Island state psychiatric hospital.

The director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall appoint, or delegate to another employee of the department the authority to appoint, employees, as the director may deem necessary for the proper management of the facilities of either or both the Eleanor Slater hospital or the Rhode Island state psychiatric hospital.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 1, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 1, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 51, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 17; G.L. 1956, § 40-3-9; P.L. 1962, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 18, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1998, ch. 391, § 5; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 4, effective June 27, 2022.

40.1-3-10 — 40.1-3-13.
[Repealed.]

40.1-3-14.
Policy as to reimbursement of private hospitals.

It is the policy of this state that the general assembly appropriate annually a sum to partially reimburse the voluntary general hospitals, such as Rhode Island hospital, and Providence lying-in hospital, for the cost of maintaining hospital facilities available for the care of citizens of this state requiring hospitalization as public ward patients for acute medical or surgical conditions or maternity care.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2038, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-3-14; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40.1-3-15.
Discrimination against osteopaths and optometrists.

There shall be no discrimination made by any state department against duly licensed osteopathic physicians and optometrists in any medical plan that involves the expenditure of state funds. Notwithstanding any provisions of a policy or contract of group accident, group health, group accident and health insurance, or the provisions of any private accident and health insurance policy, whenever the policy or contract provides for reimbursement for any optometric service that is within the lawful scope of practice of a duly licensed optometrist, a subscriber to that group accident, group health, group accident and health, or the provisions of any private accident and health insurance policy or contract shall be entitled to reimbursement for that service, whether the service is performed by a physician or duly licensed optometrist.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1652, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-3-15; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1974, ch. 263, § 1.

40.1-3-16.
Vigneron memorial fund grant account.

There is hereby created within the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals a restricted-receipt account to be known as the Vigneron memorial fund grant account. Donations deposited into the Vigneron memorial fund grant account shall be used solely to provide material for the patients at Zambarano hospital to improve their ability to express themselves, participate in motivating activities, exert greater control over their daily environment, and increase their independence.

All amounts deposited in the Vigneron memorial fund grant account on or after June 24, 2009, shall be exempt from the indirect cost recovery provisions of §

35-4-27

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 8, § 5.

Applicability.

P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 8, § 10, provides that this section takes effect upon passage [June 12, 2010] and shall apply retroactively to July 1, 2009.